apertium-ibo.ibo.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Igbo

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Verb morphology
# <inf>
# <prc>

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns N1
Pronouns(1) [<prn>:] Pronouns(2):
Verb-Patterns
Numbers [<num>:]
Prepositions [<pr>:]
Adjectives [<adj>:]
Adverbs [<adv>:]
Conjunction
Determiner [<det>:]
Numerals
Punctuation
Misc

PATTERN Verb-Patterns

:V-Affixes(1) Verbs(1) [<v>:] Verbs(2): :V-Affixes(2) V-Affixes(3)
:V-Affixes(1) Compound-Verbs(1) :V-Affixes(2) [:\ ] :Compound-Verbs(2) [<v>:] Compound-Verbs(3):  V-Affixes(3)

LEXICON N1

<n>:

LEXICON V-Affixes(3)
# this lexicon consists of 3 columns:
# - prefix
# - suffix
# - tags
# each row can be any combination of these

:{I}>     :       <inf>:
:{A}>     :       <prc>:
:         :       <pres>:
:         :>r{X}  <past>:
:na-{A}>  :       <cont>:
:ga-{A}>  :       <fut>:



###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################


#=============#
 LEXICON Nouns
#=============#

nna:nna # "father"
nne:nne   # "mother"
nwaanyi:nwanyi # "woman"
nwoke:nwoke   # "man"
nwa\ nwoke:nwa\ nwoke  # "boy"
nwa\ nwaanyi:nwa\ nwaanyi # "girl"
nwa\ okoro:nwa\ okoro   # "son"
nwa\ agbọghọ:nwa\ agbọghọ  # "daughter"
nwa:nwa   # "child"
ụmụaka:ụmụaka 	# "children"
nwanne\ nwaanyi:nwanne\ nwaanyi  # "sister"
nwanne\ nwoke:nwanne\ nwoke    	# "brother"
ndị\ mmadụ:ndị\ mmadụ   # "people"
ndị:ndị  # "people"
di:di  # "husband"
nwunye:nwunye # "wife"
amadi:amadi # "gentleman"
nwada:nwada # "lady"
mmadụ:mmadụ # "someone"
imi:imi   # "nose"
ire:ire   # "tongue"
afo:afo   # "stomach"
ahụ:ahụ   # "body"
agba:agba  # "jaw"
ihu:ihu   # "face"
mbọ:mbọ   # "nail"
ahu:ahu  # "body"
anya:anya   # "eye, eyes"
isi:isi   # "head"
ọbara:ọbara   # "blood"
mkpụlụ-obi:mkpụlụ-obi # "heart"
obi:obi	# "chest"
agba:agba # "chin"
ntutu:ntutu  # "hair"
ụkwụ:ụkwụ   	# "foot, leg"
aka:aka  # "hand"
ọlụ:ọlụ   # "neck"
ara:ara	# "breast"
ntị:ntị	# "ear"
mkpịsịaka:mkpịsịaka # "finger"
mkpịsịụkwụ:mkpịsịụkwụ # "toe"
agba:agba	# "chin, jaw"
obo-aka:obo-aka	# "palm"
onụ:onụ	 # "mouth"
azụ:azụ	# "back"
mgbili-afo:mgbili-afo  # "intestine"
akpataụkwụ:akpataụkwụ  # "thigh"
ikpere:ikpere # "kneel"
ukwu:ukwu # "waist"
nti:nti	# "cheek"
nku-anya:nku-anya  # "eyebrow"
eze:eze	 # "tooth, teeth"
igbirigb-onu:igbirigbi-onu # "lip"
ubu:ubu	# "shoulder"
mgbaji\ aka:mgbaji\ aka  # "wrist"
mgbaji\ ụkwụ:mgbaji\ ụkwụ # "ankle"
ike\ ụkwụ:ike\ ụkwụ 	# "heel"
ike:ike	# "buttom"
ntula\ aka:ntula\ aka	# "elbow"
afa\ onu:afa\ onu 	# "moustache"
nzere:nzere     # "credential"
ụzọ:ụzọ	# "way"
ogige:ogige	# "garden"
windo:windo	# "window"
tebụl:tebụl	# "table, tables"
oche:oche	# "chair, chairs"
ụlọ:ụlọ   	# "house"
aturu:aturu # "sheep"
ebule:ebule   # "ram"
akpi:akpi   # "scorpion"
ịnyịnya:ịnyịnya  # "horse"
utobo:utobo  # "hippopotamus"
ngwele\ aghu:ngwele\ aghu   # "iguana"
azasa:azasa   # "tilapia"
ebi\ iyi:ebi\ iyi   # "Eel"
isha:isha   # "crayfish"
mbe\ mmili:mbe\ mmili   # "tutle"
chekeleke:chekeleke   # "egret"
ọdụm:ọdụm   # "lion"
nkịta:nkịta   # "dog"
nkita\ ọfia:nkita\ ọfia  # "hyena"
ọkụkọ:ọkụkọ   # "fowl"
Nwa\ ỌkỤkỌ:Nwa\ ỌkỤkỌ   # "chicken"
agụ:agụ   # "leopard, tiger"
nnụnụ:nnụnụ   # "bird"
echi\ eteka:echi\ eteka   # "gaboon viper"   
egule:egule   # "weaver bird"
okpoloko:okpoloko   # "cod fish"
ńdò:ńdò   # "dove"
ehi:ehi   # "cow, cattle"
azụ:azụ   # "fish"
edi\ ụra:edi\ ụra   # "african civet"
mgbada:mgbada	# "antelope"
ene:ene  # "deer"
ọgazi:ọgazi  # "Guinea Fowl"
Oke\ Bekee:Oke\ Bekee  # "Guinea Pig"
ụsụ:ụsụ	# "bat"
esu:esu  # "millipede"
ọgbakụlụ:ọgbakụlụ  # "centipede"
nwamba:nwamba	# "cat"
ọbọgwụ:ọbọgwụ  # "duck"
nduru:nduru    # "pigeon"
enyi\ NnỤnỤ:enyi\ NnỤnỤ
ugo:ugo	# "eagle"
arụrụ:arụrụ   # "white ant"
agbisi:agbisi  # "black ant"
enyi:enyi	# "elephant"
mbala:mbala	# "frog"
ịnyịnya\ ibu:ịnyịnya\ ibu  # "mule, camel"
tatambeneke:tatambeneke   # "dragon fly"
ikpuru:ikpuru   # "maggot"
atu:atu    # "buffalo"
agu\ owulu:agu\ owulu   # "wolf"
jaki:jaki  # "donkey"
ewu:ewu	# "goat"
ọkwa:ọkwa	# "goose"
nwa\ atụtụ:nwa\ atụtụ # "lamb"
ngwere:ngwere	# "lizard"
aguiyi:aguiyi  # "crocodile"
awọ:awọ   # "toad"
enwe:enwe	# "monkey"
adaka:adaka  # "chimpanzee"
ọzọdimgba:ọzọdimgba # "gorilla"
oke:oke	# "mouse, rat"
ikwikwi:ikwikwi  # "owl"
otu\ kpokpo:otu\ kpokpo  # "wood pecker"
ugwumagana:ugwumagana  # "chameleon"
nyanwuruede:nyanwuruede   # "fox"
ezi:ezi	# "pig"
Ewii:Ewii    # "rabbit"
nchi:nchi  # "grasscutter"
oke\ ọkụkọ:oke\ ọkụkọ # "rooster"
eju:eju	# "snail"
agwọ:agwọ 	# "snake"
eke:eke     # "python"
nza:nza	# "sparrow"
icheoku:icheoku   # "parrot"
ajuani:ajuani   # "viper"
igwulube:igwulube   # "locusts"
ikili:ikili   # "galago"
ezi\ ofia:ezi\ ofia  # "hog"
isam:isam    # "periwinkle"
okpoko:okpoko  # "stork"
eke\ ogba:eke\ ogba  # "boa constrictor"
ọsa:ọsa	# "squirrel"
mbe:mbe	# "tortoise"
torotoro:torotoro # "turkey"
nche\ ụlọ:nche\ ụlọ # "wall gecko"
udele:udele	# "vulture"
ahụhụ:ahụhụ	# "ant"
aṅu:aṅu	# "bee"
akpolide:akpolide   # "taylor ant"
eneke\ nti\ oba:eneke\ nti\ oba  # "swallow"
egbe:egbe   # "hawk"
ebi\ ogwu:ebi\ ogwu  # "porcupine"
nkakwu:nkakwu  # "shrew"
nshiko:nshiko  # "crab"
ụbụba:ụbụba	# "butterfly"
eruru:eruru	# "caterpillar"
ụchịcha:ụchịcha # "cockroach"
mbuzu:mbuzu  # "cricket"
ebe:ebe   # "beetle"
chinchi:chinchi  # "bed bug"
iji:iji	# "fly"
anwụnta:anwụnta # "mosquito"
ụkpana:ụkpana  # "grasshopper"
okongono:okongono # "praying mantis"
idide:idide  # "earth worm"
nkwo:nkwo  # "kite"
ududo:ududo	# "spider"
akịka:akịka	# "termite"
igwu:igwu	# "tick"
ebu:ebu	# "wasp"
okpo:okpo	# "worm"
ututu:ututu   # "morning"
abali:abali   # "night"
ọnwa:ọnwa   # "months"
ugwu:ugwu   # "mountain"
ahihia:ahihia   # "grass"
anụmanụ:anụmanụ     # "animal"
ihu-igwe:ihu-igwe   # "weather"
ala:ala   # "earth"
igba:igba   # "season"
ikuku:ikuku   # "air"
obodo:obodo   # "city"
onyonyo:onyonyo  # "tv"
klọb:klọb     # "club"
agbụrụ:agbụrụ    # "ethnicity"
emume:emume     #  "ceremony"
ọha:ọha     # "public"
ndekọ:ndekọ    # "record"
ahụike:ahụike   # "health"
mmiri:mmiri   # "water"
ndụ:ndụ   # "life"
ọkụ:ọkụ   # "fire"
mkpụrụ:mkpụrụ   # "fruit"
osimiri:osimiri   # "sea"
osísí:osísí   # "tree"
ubi:ubi   # "field"
uchichi:uchichi   # "night"
ufereoyi:ufereoyi   # "wind"
urupuru:urupuru   # "cloud"
ụwa:ụwa   # "world"
uwa:uwa   # "nature"
mmụọ:mmụọ   # "spirit"
ọmụmụ:ọmụmụ    # "birth"
ọdọ:ọdọ   # "lake"
ohia:ohia   # "forest"
ọkụkụ:ọkụkụ   # "plant"
abu:abu   # "song"
achịcha:achịcha   # "bread"
etiti:etiti     # "middle"
mmekọrịta:mmekọrịta   # "relationship"
akụkụ:akụkụ       # "part"
aha:aha   # "name"
afịa:afịa   # "market"
agbọ:agbọ   # "bond"
ago:ago   # "defense"
agwa:agwa   # "character"
ahịa:ahịa   # "market"
aji:aji   # "wool"
ajuju:ajuju   # "question"
akpa:akpa   # "bag"
akpu:akpu   # "knob"
akpụkpọ:akpụkpọ   # "shoes"
akwa:akwa   # "cloth"
uwe:uwe   # "shirt"
akwụkwọ:akwụkwọ   # "book"
alaka:alaka   # "branch"
egwu:egwu # "fright"
anụ:anụ   # "meat"
arọ:arọ   # "arrow"
bọta:bọta   # "butter"
chiiz:chiiz   # "cheese"
ẹbẹ:ẹbẹ   # "apology"
ebo:ebo   # "tribe"
echebe:echebe   # "protection"
enyì:enyì   # "friend"
eze:eze   # "king"
Ifẹ:Ifẹ   # "love"
ihunaanya:ihunaanya   # "love"
íjè:íjè   # "movement"
ijèọma:ijèọma   # "farewell"
iro:iro   # "enemy"
iru:iru   # "security"
isi:isi   # "odor"
ite:ite   # "pot"
iyi:iyi   # "stream"
kọfị:kọfị   # "coffee"
ụda:ụda   # "sound"
mbà:mbà   # "depression"
mbido:mbido   # "origin"
mkpisi:mkpisi   # "stick"
mma:mma   # "quality"
mmechị:mmechị   # "conclusion"
ndụdụ:ndụdụ   # "fork"
ngaji:ngaji   # "spoon"
mmeri:mmeri   # "victory"
nku:nku   # "wood"
ńnú:ńnú   # "salt"
nri:nri   # "food"
nsogbu:nsogbu   # "problem"
ntị:ntị   # "listen"
ntụ:ntụ   # "flour"
ọkachamara:ọkachamara    # "expert"
ndụmọdụ:ndụmọdụ      # "advice"
onyinye:onyinye   # "gift"
obianuohia:obianuohia   # "park"
oche:oche   # "seat"
ọka:ọka   # "corn"
oké:oké   # "border"
okpu:okpu   # "hat"
okpueze:okpueze   # "crown"
ọma:ọma   # "well"
ọnụ:ọnụ   # "together"
sanwich:sanwich   # "sandwich"
taa:taa   # "tar"
ube:ube   # "spear"
ụgbọ:ụgbọ   # "vehicle"
ọnwụ:ọnwụ    # "death"
njem:njem    # "journey"
ụra:ụra   # "sleep"
na-ehi\ ụra:na-ehi\ ụra     # "sleeping"
usoro:usoro   # "format"
egwuregwu:egwuregwu   # "game"
n'ime:n'ime   # "inside"
ebe:ebe   # "place"
nkiri:nkiri  # "theater"
ụbọchị:ụbọchị  # "day"
n'afọ:n'afọ  # "year"
mmalite:mmalite  # "evolution"
Naịjirịa:Naịjirịa   # "Nigeria"
mahadum:mahadum  # "university"
akụkọ:akụkọ   # "story"
Lagos:Lagos   # "lagos"
agha:agha    # "war"
nhazi:nhazi   # "processing"
mmepụta:mmepụta  # "output"
ezumike:ezumike   # "vacation"
atụmatụ:atụmatụ   # "plan"
ọgụ:ọgụ       # "fight"
mmanụ:mmanụ    # "oil"
ụka:ụka     # "church"
mgbasa:mgbasa   # "dismissal"
ọchịchị:ọchịchị    # "government"
gọọmentị:gọọmentị   # "government"
nnọchi:nnọchi    # "replacement"
ndọrọ\ ndọrọ\ ọchịchị:ndọrọ\ ndọrọ\ ọchịchị  # "politics"
ego:ego  # "money"
n'ọnwa:n'ọnwa   # "per month"
bọọlụ:bọọlụ   # "ball"
nka:nka    # "art"
asọmpi:asọmpi  # "competition"
akara:akara  # "marK"
ozi:ozi  # "message"
ọrịa:ọrịa  # "disease"
onwa:onwa   # "moon"
iwu:iwu  # "law"
onwe:onwe  # "self"
okwu:okwu   # "speech"
ji:ji  # "yam"
ikike:ikike  # "authority"
Afrịka:Afrịka   # "africa"
ọgwụ:ọgwụ    # "medicine"
azụmahịa:azụmahịa    # "business"
ụgwọ:ụgwọ       # "debt"
sayensị"sayensị   # "science"
ngalaba:ngalaba  # "department"
mmemme:mmemme   # "program"
omume:omume    # "behavior"
ikpe:ikpe   # "case"
mmadu:mmadu   # "human"
arụ:arụ      # "sacrilege"
anyanwụ:anyanwụ  #"sun"
akwukwo:akwukwo   # "leaf"
akwụkwọ:akwụkwọ   # "book"
edemede:edemede   # "script"
mkpa:mkpa     # "need"
bekee:bekee   # "english"
ngosi:ngosi   # "display"
ebubo:ebubo    # "accusation"
mmụta:mmụta   # "learning"
mmuta:mmuta   # "literacy"
ọnọdụ:ọnọdụ    # "situation"
agụmakwụkwọ:agụmakwụkwọ  # "education"
asụsụ:asụsụ   # "language"
ụdị:ụdị          # "type"
mgbochi:mgbochi  # "prevention"
ọla:ọla      # "jewel"
echiche:echiche    # "idea"
asambodo:asambodo   # "asambodo"
ohere:ohere      # "vacancy"
igwe:igwe    # " machine"
akụ:akụ         # "treasure"
ụba:ụba      # "fortune"
ọrụ:ọrụ         # "task" 
akụnụba:akụnụba  # "wealth"
ọdịnala:ọdịnala   # "tradition"
omenala:omenala   # "culture"
nkwekọrịta:nkwekọrịta   # "agreement"
Jenụwarị:Jenụwarị  # "January"
Febrụwarị:Febrụwarị  # "Febuary"
Maachị:Maachị         # "March"
Eprel:Eprel       # "April"
Juun:Juun         # "June"
Julaị:Julaị            # "July"
Ọgọọst:Ọgọọst   # "August"
Septemba:Septemba # "September"
Ọktoba:Ọktoba    # "October"
Nọvemba:Nọvemba   # "November"
Disemba:Disemba   # "December"




#================#
 LEXICON Pronouns(2)
#================#

# Inseparable
m:m           <pers><p1><sg><subj>:   # "I"
ị:ị           <pers><p2><sg><subj>:   # "you"   FIXME: vowel harmony
ị:i           <pers><p2><sg><subj>:   # "you"   ! Dir/LR
ọ:ọ           <pers><p3><sg><subj>:   # "she, he"  FIXME: vowel harmony
ọ:o           <pers><p3><sg><subj>:   # "she, he"  ! Dir/LR
a:a           <ind>:                  # "one/someone"  FIXME: vowel harmony
a:e           <ind>:                  # "one/someone"  ! Dir/LR
